Florida, session 2026, HB847.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
220.196, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
220.196 Research and development tax credit.—
(2) TAX CREDIT.—
(e) The combined total amount of tax credits which may be
granted to all business enterprises under this section during
any calendar year is $50 $9 million, except that the total
amount that may be awarded in the 2018 calendar year is $16.5
million. Applications may be filed with the department on or
after March 20 and before March 27 for qualified research
expenses incurred within the preceding calendar year. If the
total credits for all applicants exceed the maximum amount
allowed under this paragraph, the credits shall be allocated on
a prorated basis.
Section 2. The amendment made by this act to s. 220.196,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb847-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 847 2026
Florida Statutes, first applies to the 2027 allocation of tax
credits for expenses incurred in calendar year 2026.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb847-00